Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201871-9602
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Investigational Drug Use Act:

(1) Advanced illness means any progressive disease or medical or surgical condition that entails significant functional impairment, that is not considered by a treating physician to be reversible even with administration of federally approved and available treatments, and that, without life-sustaining procedures, would likely result in death within six months;

(2) Eligible patient means a person who meets the requirements of section 71-9603;

(3) Health care provider has the same meaning as in section 71-7907;

(4) Investigational drug, biological product, or device means any drug, biological product, or device that has successfully completed phase one of a clinical trial but has not yet been approved for general use by the United States Food and Drug Administration and remains under investigation in a clinical trial approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration;

(5) Physician means any person who is licensed to practice medicine and surgery pursuant to the Medicine and Surgery Practice Act; and

(6) Written, informed consent means a writing which conforms to section 71-9604.

Laws 2018, LB117, § 2.
July 19, 2018
Medicine and Surgery Practice Act, see section 38-2001.